Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF78.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 11 TLSB 2196XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 78 Section 1. Section 15H.5, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. The program shall provide grants for projects that 3 utilize a service-learning approach during the summer months 4 to enhance student achievement and summer learning retention, 5 teach meaningful job skills to Iowa youth, engage Iowa youth 6 in their communities, provide positive youth development 7 experiences, and address the needs of youth from families with 8 low income. The service-learning approach shall be integrated 9 into the program using curricula related to the skilled trades, 10 including trades related to welding, machinist technology, 11 tool and die making, carpentry, electrical work, plumbing, 12 automotive mechanics technology, and heating, ventilation, 13 and air conditioning technology, science, technology, 14 engineering, mathematics, social studies, civic literacy, or 15 other appropriate curricula identified by the department of 16 education. 17 Sec. 2. Section 84A.21, subsection 2, paragraph c, 18 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 19 (1) The purpose of the second component of the program is to 20 assist in placing Iowa students studying in the skilled trades, 21 including trades related to welding, machinist technology, 22 tool and die making, carpentry, electrical work, plumbing, 23 automotive mechanics technology, and heating, ventilation, 24 and air conditioning technology, or in the fields of science, 25 technology, engineering, and mathematics into internships 26 that lead to permanent positions with Iowa employers. The 27 department of workforce development shall collaborate with 28 eligible employers, including but not limited to innovative 29 businesses, to ensure that the interns hired are studying in 30 such fields. An Iowa employer may receive financial assistance 31 on a matching basis for a portion of the wages paid to an 32 intern. If providing financial assistance, the department 33 of workforce development shall provide the assistance on 34 a reimbursement basis such that for every two dollars of 35 -1- LSB 2196XS (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 11 S.F. 78 wages earned by the student, one dollar paid by the employer 1 is matched by one dollar from the department of workforce 2 development. The amount of financial assistance shall not 3 exceed five thousand dollars per internship. The department 4 of workforce development may adopt rules to administer this 5 component. In adopting rules to administer this component, 6 the department of workforce development shall adopt rules as 7 similar as possible to those adopted pursuant to paragraph âbâ . 8 Sec. 3. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph h, 9 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (c), Code 2025, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 (c) Applied sciences, technology, engineering, and 12 manufacturing, including transportation, distribution, 13 logistics, architecture, and construction , and curricula 14 related to the skilled trades, including trades related to 15 welding, machinist technology, tool and die making, carpentry, 16 electrical work, plumbing, automotive mechanics technology, and 17 heating, ventilation, and air conditioning technology . 18 Sec. 4. Section 256.111, subsections 3, 4, and 5, Code 2025, 19 are amended to read as follows: 20 3. A science, technology, engineering, and mathematics 21 collaborative initiative is established within the innovation 22 division for purposes of supporting activities directly 23 related to recruitment of prekindergarten through grade twelve 24 mathematics and science teachers for ongoing mathematics and 25 science programming for students enrolled in prekindergarten 26 through grade twelve and for the recruitment of grade one 27 through grade twelve teachers for ongoing programming related 28 to the skilled trades, including trades related to welding, 29 machinist technology, tool and die making, carpentry, 30 electrical work, plumbing, automotive mechanics technology, and 31 heating, ventilation, and air conditioning technology . 32 4. The collaborative initiative shall prioritize student 33 interest in achievement in science, technology, engineering, 34 and mathematics and the skilled trades, including trades 35 -2- LSB 2196XS (1) 91 jda/jh 2/ 11 S.F. 78 related to welding, machinist technology, tool and die making, 1 carpentry, electrical work, plumbing, automotive mechanics 2 technology, and heating, ventilation, and air conditioning 3 technology ; reach every student and teacher in every school 4 district in the state; identify, recruit, prepare, and support 5 the best mathematics , and science , and skilled trades teachers; 6 and sustain exemplary programs. The innovation division shall 7 collaborate with the community colleges to develop skilled 8 trades and science, technology, engineering, and mathematics 9 professional development programs for community college 10 instructors and for purposes of skilled trades and science, 11 technology, engineering, and mathematics curricula development. 12 5. Subject to an appropriation of moneys by the general 13 assembly, the innovation division shall administer the 14 following: 15 a. Regional science, technology, engineering, and 16 mathematics networks for Iowa, the purpose of which is to 17 equalize science, technology, engineering, and mathematics 18 education enrichment opportunities , and enrichment 19 opportunities related to skilled trades, including trades 20 related to welding, machinist technology, tool and die making, 21 carpentry, electrical work, plumbing, automotive mechanics 22 technology, and heating, ventilation, and air conditioning 23 technology, that are available to learners statewide. The 24 innovation division shall establish six geographically similar 25 regional science, technology, engineering, and mathematics 26 networks across Iowa that complement and leverage existing 27 resources, including extension service assets, area education 28 agencies, state accredited postsecondary institutions, informal 29 educational centers, school districts, economic development 30 zones, and existing public and private science, technology, 31 engineering, and mathematics partnerships. Each network 32 shall be managed by a highly qualified science, technology, 33 engineering, and mathematics and skilled trades advocate 34 positioned at a network hub to be determined through a 35 -3- LSB 2196XS (1) 91 jda/jh 3/ 11 S.F. 78 competitive application process. Oversight for each regional 1 network shall be provided by a regional advisory board. 2 Members of the board shall be appointed by the governor. The 3 membership shall represent prekindergarten through grade twelve 4 school districts and schools, and higher education, business, 5 nonprofit organizations, youth agencies, and other appropriate 6 stakeholders. 7 b. A focused array of the best skilled trades and 8 science, technology, engineering, and mathematics enrichment 9 opportunities, selected through a competitive application 10 process, that can be expanded to meet future needs. A limited, 11 focused list of selected exemplary programs shall be made 12 available to each regional network. 13 c. Statewide skilled trades and science, technology, 14 engineering, and mathematics programming designed to increase 15 participation of students and teachers in successful learning 16 experiences; to increase the number of science, technology, 17 engineering, and mathematics-related teaching majors offered 18 by the stateâs universities; to increase the number of skilled 19 trades programs offered by the state accredited postsecondary 20 institutions; to elevate public awareness of the opportunities; 21 and to increase collaboration and partnerships. 22 Sec. 5. Section 256.210, subsection 6, paragraph b, Code 23 2025, is amended to read as follows: 24 b. The adjutant general shall submit a report to the 25 governor and the general assembly by December 31 of each 26 year listing the science, technology, engineering, and 27 mathematics-related career fields , and the career fields 28 related to the skilled trades, including trades related to 29 welding, machinist technology, tool and die making, carpentry, 30 electrical work, plumbing, automotive mechanics technology, and 31 heating, ventilation, and air conditioning technology, that the 32 adjutant general plans to focus on in providing educational 33 incentives under this section and section 256.211 using funds 34 available under this subsection for that fiscal year. 35 -4- LSB 2196XS (1) 91 jda/jh 4/ 11 S.F. 78 Sec. 6. Section 256.211, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The adjutant general has the authority under this 3 section to authorize the expenditure of unencumbered or 4 unobligated funds as described in section 256.210, subsection 5 6 , to recruit or retain individuals who have completed or 6 are pursuing training in science, technology, engineering, 7 and mathematics-related military occupational specialties , 8 occupational specialties related to the skilled trades, 9 including trades related to welding, machinist technology, 10 tool and die making, carpentry, electrical work, plumbing, 11 automotive mechanics technology, and heating, ventilation, and 12 air conditioning technology, or air force specialty codes by 13 issuing awards through a national guard student loan repayment 14 program in accordance with subsection 2 or by providing a 15 scholarship award to an eligible member of the national guard 16 who is enrolled at an institution defined in section 256.210, 17 subsection 1 , paragraph âdâ , in a masterâs degree program 18 that is in compliance with the federal Edith Nourse Rogers 19 STEM scholarship program established under 38 U.S.C. Â§3320 in 20 accordance with the requirements of subsection 3 . 21 Sec. 7. Section 256.218, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 22 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 b. The applicant is preparing to teach in fields including 24 but not limited to science, technology, engineering, or 25 mathematics; English as a second language or special education 26 instruction; the skilled trades, including trades related 27 to welding, machinist technology, tool and die making, 28 carpentry, electrical work, plumbing, automotive mechanics 29 technology, and heating, ventilation, and air conditioning 30 technology; or is preparing to teach in a hard-to-staff subject 31 as identified by the department. The department shall take 32 into account the varying regional needs in the state for 33 teachers in these subject areas when applying the criterion 34 of this paragraph. The department shall annually identify 35 -5- LSB 2196XS (1) 91 jda/jh 5/ 11 S.F. 78 and designate hard-to-staff subjects for the purpose of this 1 paragraph. The eligibility of an applicant who receives a 2 teach Iowa scholar grant and who is preparing to teach in a 3 hard-to-staff subject as identified by the department shall 4 not be affected in subsequent years if the department does not 5 continue to identify that subject as a hard-to-staff subject. 6 Sec. 8. Section 261E.3, subsection 3, paragraph j, Code 7 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 j. All eligible postsecondary institutions providing 9 programming under this chapter shall include the unique student 10 identifier assigned to students while in the kindergarten 11 through grade twelve system as a part of the institutionâs 12 student data management system. Eligible postsecondary 13 institutions providing programming under this chapter shall 14 cooperate with the department on data requests related to 15 the programming. All eligible postsecondary institutions 16 providing programming under this chapter shall collect data 17 and report to the department on the proportion of females and 18 minorities enrolled in educational opportunities related to the 19 skilled trades, including trades related to welding, machinist 20 technology, tool and die making, carpentry, electrical work, 21 plumbing, automotive mechanics technology, and heating, 22 ventilation, and air conditioning technology, or in science, 23 technology, engineering, and mathematics-oriented educational 24 opportunities provided in accordance with this chapter . 25 The department shall submit the programming data and the 26 departmentâs findings and recommendations in a report to the 27 general assembly annually by January 15. 28 Sec. 9. STEM ADVISORY COUNCIL. The science, technology, 29 engineering, and math advisory council, created by the governor 30 of this state by executive order on July 26, 2011, and modified 31 by executive order on May 15, 2013, shall do all of the 32 following: 33 1. Using existing funding and programmatic support, provide 34 opportunities for students enrolled in kindergarten through 35 -6- LSB 2196XS (1) 91 jda/jh 6/ 11 S.F. 78 grade twelve to experience science, technology, engineering, 1 and mathematics through the skilled trades, including trades 2 related to welding, machinist technology, tool and die making, 3 carpentry, electrical work, plumbing, automotive mechanics 4 technology, and heating, ventilation, and air conditioning 5 technology. 6 2. Authorize teachers participating in externship programs 7 facilitated by the council to participate in externship 8 programs related to the skilled trades, including trades 9 related to welding, machinist technology, tool and die making, 10 carpentry, electrical work, plumbing, automotive mechanics 11 technology, and heating, ventilation, and air conditioning 12 technology. 13 3. Include and highlight the skilled trades, including 14 trades related to welding, machinist technology, tool and 15 die making, carpentry, electrical work, plumbing, automotive 16 mechanics technology, and heating, ventilation, and air 17 conditioning technology, as part of the councilâs efforts 18 to promote educational opportunities related to science, 19 technology, engineering, and math within this stateâs education 20 system and workforce. 21 Sec. 10. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to 22 applications submitted to the college student aid commission on 23 or after the effective date of this Act: 24 1. The section of this Act amending section 256.211. 25 2. The section of this Act amending section 256.218. 26